Washington statutes.
RCW 43.58.050

Oregon-Washington Columbia River boundary compact—Ratification.

The interstate compact determining the Oregon-Washington boundary on the Columbia River which was executed on the 21st day of December, 1956 by the Oregon commission on interstate cooperation for the state of Oregon and the Washington-Oregon boundary commission for the state of Washington is hereby ratified and approved.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.58.050. Prior: 1957 c 90 s 1.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The effective date of RCW 43.58.050 was March 13, 1957. State Constitution, Amendment 33, recognizing the modification of the state's boundaries through appropriate compact procedure, was approved by the voters on November 4th, 1958, and the governor's proclamation relating thereto was issued on December 4th, 1958.

The Oregon legislature has ratified the compact, see Oregon Revised Statutes ss 186.510 and 186.520, effective April 4, 1957. See also, Article XVI of the Oregon Constitution relating to state boundaries which was adopted by the people November 4, 1958, effective December 3, 1958.

Congressional ratification is contained in Public Law 85-575, dated July 31, 1958.